Washington statutes.
RCW 18.360.020

Certification or registration required.

(1) No person may practice as a medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-hemodialysis technician, medical assistant-phlebotomist, medical assistant-EMT, or forensic phlebotomist unless he or she is certified under RCW 18.360.040.

(2) No person may practice as a medical assistant-registered unless he or she is registered under RCW 18.360.040.

[ 2024 c 217 s 2; 2017 c 336 s 15; 2012 c 153 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2017 c 336: See note following RCW 9.96.060.

Effective date—2012 c 153 ss 1-12, 14, 16, and 18: See note following RCW 18.360.005.

Rules—2012 c 153: See note following RCW 18.360.005.